Nevada, session 83, AB303.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 338 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
A contractor or subcontractor engaged on a public work that is
a project for the development, deployment or improvement of
broadband, telecommunication or fiber optic services who,
pursuant to subsection 6 of NRS 338.070, submits to the public
body awarding the contract a copy of a record required pursuant
to subsection 5 of NRS 338.070 shall simultaneously submit a
copy of the record to the Board of Directors of the Nevada State
Infrastructure Bank.
Sec. 2. NRS 338.011 is hereby amended to read as follows:
338.011 The requirements of this chapter do not apply to a
contract:
1. Awarded in compliance with chapter 332 or 333 of NRS
which is directly related to the normal operation of the public body
or the normal maintenance of its property.
2. Awarded to meet an emergency which results from a natural
or artificially created disaster and which threatens the health, safety
or welfare of the public. If the public body or its authorized
representative determines that an emergency exists, a contract or
contracts necessary to contend with the emergency may be let
without complying with the requirements of this chapter. If such
emergency action was taken by the authorized representative, the
authorized representative shall report the contract or contracts to the
public body at the next regularly scheduled meeting of the public
body.
3. Awarded for the development, deployment or improvement
of privately owned broadband, telecommunication or fiber optic
services.
H
-
*AB303_R1*